Illinois, session 104th, HB1219.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The General Assembly Operations Act is amended 5by adding Section 17 as follows: 6    (25 ILCS 10/17 new)7    Sec. 17. Use of private land. If a legislator introduces 8legislation that results in the taking of private land for a 9project in another legislator's district, then a project of 10that same type must be completed in the district of the 11legislator who introduced the legislation that resulted in the 12taking of private land.